Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-1309
Public funds; all-purpose levy; maximum limit.

Notwithstanding provisions in the statutes of Nebraska to the contrary, for any fiscal year the governing body of any city of the first class, city of the second class, or village may decide to certify to the county clerk for collection one all-purpose levy required to be raised by taxation for all municipal purposes instead of certifying a schedule of levies for specific purposes added together. Subject to the limits in section 77-3442, the all-purpose levy shall not exceed an annual levy of eighty-seven and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars for cities of the first class and one dollar and five cents on each one hundred dollars for cities of the second class and villages upon the taxable valuation of all the taxable property in such city or village. Otherwise authorized extraordinary levies to service and pay bonded indebtedness of such municipalities may be made by such municipalities in addition to such all-purpose levy.

Laws 1957, c. 47, § 1, p. 227;

Laws 1959, c. 67, § 1, p. 293;

Laws 1965, c. 83, § 1, p. 322;

Laws 1967, c. 96, § 1, p. 293;

Laws 1971, LB 845, § 1;

Laws 1972, LB 1143, § 1;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 81;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 81;

Laws 1996, LB 1114, § 35.